Utah statutes.
17-53-205.   Special meetings -- How called -- Business limited.

(1)  If the business of the county requires a special meeting of the legislative body, such meeting may be ordered by a majority of the legislative body or by the chair.

(2)  Each order calling a special meeting shall:

(a)  be signed by the members or chair calling the meeting;

(b)  be entered in the minutes of the legislative body; and

(c)  specify the business to be transacted at the meeting.

(3)  No business other than that specified in the order may be transacted at a special meeting unless all members of the county legislative body are present and give their consent.

(4)  Except as otherwise provided by county ordinance, the county clerk shall give five days notice of each special meeting to each member of a county legislative body that does not join in the order calling the meeting.

